Mississippi, session 2026, HB1792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Talent Exchange for Advancement of Careers and Higher Education (TEACH) Credit Act". (2)  The Legislature finds and declares that: (a)  Mississippi faces a shortage of qualified instructors in high-demand Career and Technical Education (CTE) fields and in workforce training; (b)  Private industry possesses untapped instructional expertise; and (c)  Incentivizing private employers to loan skilled employees to serve as instructors at Mississippi community colleges will strengthen the state's workforce pipeline, enhance student access to industry-aligned training, and support economic growth. (3)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Employer" means a private company or business entity authorized to do business in Mississippi. (b)  "Loaned employee" means a qualified employee of an employer who is assigned to teach at a Mississippi community college under this section. (c)  "Community college" means a public community or junior college established under Chapter 29, Title 37, Mississippi Code of 1972. (d)  "CTE program" means a Career and Technical Education program at a public community college that is designated as high-demand. (e)  "Workforce training" means training in association with a public community college. (4) (a)  An employer shall be eligible for a state income tax credit equal to the amount of salary and benefits paid to a loaned employee during the period of assignment as an instructor in a designated CTE program or workforce training at a Mississippi community college.  An employer may claim the tax credit for the portion of salary and benefits directly paid by the employer and not otherwise reimbursed by public funds or workforce development grants, including, but not limited to, Workforce Enhancement Training, MS Works, or AccelerateMS programs.  The credit shall not exceed the taxpayer's income tax liability in a tax year.  Any tax credit claimed under this section but not used in any taxable year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credits were earned. (b)  The tax credit authorized under this section shall be claimed against the employer's state income tax liability for the taxable year in which the loaned employee serves as an instructor. (c)  The maximum aggregate amount of tax credits that may be claimed by all taxpayers claiming a credit under this section in a taxable year shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). (5)  (a)  The Mississippi Community College Board, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall administer the TEACH Credit program.  The board shall ensure that Mississippi community colleges:  (i) designate eligible CTE programs and/or workforce training programs based on workforce demand; (ii) approve employer participation and verify employee qualifications; (iii) allow colleges to provide a stipend to loaned employees, separate from employer compensation, if applicable; and (iv) maintain records of program participation and outcomes. (6)  (a)  To qualify for the tax credit authorized under this section, an employer must:  (i) continue to pay the loaned employee's full salary and benefits during the teaching assignment; (ii) assign the employee to teach in an approved CTE program or workforce training program for a minimum period as determined by each community college in conjunction with the employer; and (iii) enter into a written agreement with the community college specifying terms of the assignment. (b) A loaned employee must meet minimum instructor qualifications as established by the community college with whom the partnership takes place. (7)  (a)  Employers and community colleges shall submit annual reports to the Mississippi Community College Board detailing program participation, instructional impact, and workforce outcomes. (b)  The Mississippi Community College Board shall submit an annual report to the Legislature evaluating program effectiveness, including recommendations for improvement or expansion. (8)  (a)  Employers participating in the program may receive public recognition for workforce development contributions. (b)  Community colleges may prioritize placement of loaned employees in sectors with critical shortages. (c)  The Mississippi Community College Board may encourage partnerships with industry associations to promote program participation. (9)  The Mississippi Community College Board and the Department of Revenue shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the board and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section. SECTION 2. Section 1 of this act shall be codified as new section in Chapter 7, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall affect or defeat any claim, assessment, appeal, suit, right or cause of action for taxes due or accrued under the income tax laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, whether such claims, assessments, appeals, suits or actions have been begun before the date on which this act becomes effective or are begun thereafter; and the provisions of the income tax laws are expressly continued in full force, effect and operation for the purpose of the assessment, collection and enrollment of liens for any taxes due or accrued and the execution of any warrant under such laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, and for the imposition of any penalties, forfeitures or claims for failure to comply with such laws. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2026.